District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2303.16

Prosecution for violation of § 3-2303.03, § 3-2303.13, or § 3-2303.14

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(g), 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1703.1 to 2-1703.21.